Tennessee, session 114, HB0287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-611, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) For the purposes of oversight, the commissioner of correction shall provide a
report of the death of a person in the custody of the department at a department facility
within five (5) business days of the person's death to the state senator and
representative who represented the deceased person. The state legislators receiving
the report are determined by the last known home address of the deceased person in
this state.
(b) The information contained in the report required pursuant to subsection (a)
must include, but not be limited to, the name of the department facility where the death
occurred, subject to § 10-7-504.
(c) This section does not apply to the deaths of persons whose last known home
address was not in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0287
000368
- 1 -